Hawaii statutes.
§852-2 Penalty. Any person who refuses
or wilfully fails to move as directed by such officer shall be fined not more
than $200 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both. [L Sp 1949, c 9, §2;
RL 1955, §297-2; HRS §754-2; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 706-663.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next